Utah statutes.
32B-16-201.   Liability related to applicable fine.

(1)  A minor is liable to a retail licensee in an amount described in Subsection (2) if:

(a)  the commission imposes an applicable fine against the retail licensee on the basis of a violation related to a minor; and

(b)  the minor, as part of the minor's involvement in the violation described in Subsection (1)(a), uses proof of age in violation of Chapter 1, Part 4, Proof of Age Act.

(2)  If the conditions of Subsection (1) are met, a minor is liable to a retail licensee for an amount equal to the sum of:

(a)  one-half of the amount of the applicable fine imposed against the retail licensee; and

(b)  the costs and attorney fees incurred by the retail licensee under Section 32B-16-301 to collect the amount owed under this section.

